Utah statutes.
30-8-4.   Content.

(1)  Parties to a premarital agreement may contract with respect to:

(a)  the rights and obligations of each of the parties in any of the property of either or both of them whenever and wherever acquired or located;

(b)  the right to buy, sell, use, transfer, exchange, abandon, lease, consume, expend, assign, create a security interest in, mortgage, encumber, dispose of, or otherwise manage and control property;

(c)  the disposition of property upon separation, marital dissolution, death, or the occurrence or nonoccurrence of any other event;

(d)  the modification or elimination of spousal support;

(e)  the ownership rights in and disposition of the death benefit from a life insurance policy;

(f)  the choice of law governing the construction of the agreement, except that a court of competent jurisdiction may apply the law of the legal domicile of either party, if it is fair and equitable; and

(g)  any other matter, including their personal rights and obligations, not in violation of public policy or a statute imposing a criminal penalty.

(2)  The right of a child to support, health and medical provider expenses, medical insurance, and child care coverage may not be affected by a premarital agreement.

